Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5426.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 28 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 28.214(6)(b) Pub trst F Unauthorized disclosure of information from LEIN ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 28.293(1) Pub ord E False information when applying for state ID 5 28.293(2) Pub ord D False information when applying for state ID ï¿½ second offense 7 28.293(3) Pub ord C False information when applying for state ID ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15 28.295(1)(a) Pub ord D Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for 10 years or more 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 28.295(1)(b) Pub ord E Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for less than 10 years or a misdemeanor punishable by more than 6 months 5 28.295(2) Pub ord E Selling counterfeited or forged state ID card or possessing counterfeited or forged state ID card with intent to deliver to another person or possessing 2 or more counterfeited or forged state ID cards 5 28.295(5) Property H Using stolen state ID card to commit felony Variable 28.295a(1) Pub ord H False representation to obtain or misuse personal information 4 28.295a(2) Pub ord G False representation to obtain or misuse personal information ï¿½ second offense 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 28.295a(3) Pub ord C False representation to obtain or misuse personal information ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15 28.308 Pub saf E False certification or statement in application for enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card 5 28.422(14) Pub saf F Forgery on firearm license application 4 28.422a(5) Pub saf F False statement on firearm sales record 4 28.425b(3) Pub saf F False statement on concealed pistol permit application 4 28.425j(3) Pub saf F Unlawful granting or presenting of pistol training certificate 4 28.425o(6)(c) Pub saf F Carrying concealed pistol or electro-muscular disruption device in prohibited place ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 28.429(4) Pub saf E Failure to store a firearm resulting in injury 5 28.429(5) Pub saf D Failure to store a firearm resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 28.429(6) Pub saf C Failure to store a firearm resulting in death 15 28.435(14)(c) Pub saf G Firearm sale without trigger lock, gun case, or storage container ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 2 28.468(1)(c) Pub saf E Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing serious impairment 5 28.468(1)(d) Pub saf C Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing death 15 28.516(2) Pub saf F False statement on concealed firearm certificate application 4 28.674 Pub saf F False report of a public threat 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 28.725d(3) Pub ord F Employment at certain businesses by sex offender 4 28.729(1)(a) Pub ord F Failure to register as a sex offender, first offense 4 28.729(1)(b) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, second offense 7 28.729(1)(c) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, third or subsequent offense 10 28.729(2) Pub ord F Failure to update sex offender registration information 2 28.754(1) Pub ord F False report of a child abduction 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5425 (request no. H01919'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.